West Virginia, session 2026, SB771.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION. §5A-1-13. West Virginia Capitol Chapel Act. (a) Short Title -- This act shall be known and cited as the "West Virginia Capitol Chapel Act".(b) Purpose -- The purpose of this act is to establish a non-denominational chapel within the West Virginia Capitol building to provide a space for prayer, meditation, and religious observance, accommodating all faiths and beliefs.(c) Establishment of a Capitol Chapel --(1) The state of West Virginia shall designate and maintain a chapel within the West Virginia Capitol building for the purpose of religious reflection, prayer, and meditation.(2) The chapel shall be open to all individuals regardless of religious affiliation and shall be used in a manner that upholds the principles of religious freedom as guaranteed by the First Amendment of the United States Constitution.(d) Management and Oversight -- (1) The Department of Administration shall oversee the establishment, maintenance, and operation of the chapel.(2) A Capitol Chapel Advisory Committee shall be formed to provide guidance on its use, ensuring inclusivity and adherence to non-discriminatory practices. This committee shall consist of: (A) One representative from each of the following: One member from the West Virginia House of Delegates; (B) One member from the West Virginia Senate; (C) Member of the public; (D) The Secretary of Administration or their designee, serving as the chair.(e) Funding and Maintenance --(1) The chapel shall be funded through appropriations from the state budget, private donations, and grants as deemed appropriate.(2) No state funds may be used for the promotion of any specific religion, and the space shall remain neutral in its religious representation.(f) Usage Guidelines --(1) The chapel shall be open during regular Capitol business hours and accessible to all visitors, legislators, and employees.(2) Scheduling for organized services or events shall be managed through the Department of Administration on a non-discriminatory basis.(3) No religious group may have exclusive rights to the chapel, and all uses shall align with the principles of inclusivity and respect for diverse beliefs.(g) Effective Date --This act shall take effect immediately upon passage.